Mississippi, session 2026, HB4182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Ivory Moore, Jr., of Washington County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Shoplifting on August 16, 2000, in Washington County, for which he was sentenced to serve thirty-six (36) months probation under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He violated probation and was sentenced to serve three (3) years on House Arrest. He was released on House Arrest on November 27, 2001 and was discharged the same day.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.